Illinois, session 104th, HB1246.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 3-125 and 4-118 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/3-125)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 3-125)7    Sec. 3-125. Financing. 8    (a) The city council or the board of trustees of the 9municipality shall annually levy a tax upon all the taxable 10property of the municipality at the rate on the dollar which 11will produce an amount which, when added to the deductions 12from the salaries or wages of police officers, and revenues 13available from other sources, will equal a sum sufficient to 14meet the annual requirements of the police pension fund. The 15annual requirements to be provided by such tax levy are equal 16to (1) the normal cost of the pension fund for the year 17involved, plus (2) an amount sufficient to bring the total 18assets of the pension fund up to 90% of the total actuarial 19liabilities of the pension fund by the end of municipal fiscal 20year 2050 2040, as annually updated and determined by an 21enrolled actuary employed by the Illinois Department of 22Insurance or by an enrolled actuary retained by the pension 23fund or the municipality. In making these determinations, the   HB1246- 2 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1required minimum employer contribution shall be calculated 2each year as a level percentage of payroll over the years 3remaining up to and including fiscal year 2050 2040 and shall 4be determined under the projected unit credit actuarial cost 5method. The tax shall be levied and collected in the same 6manner as the general taxes of the municipality, and in 7addition to all other taxes now or hereafter authorized to be 8levied upon all property within the municipality, and shall be 9in addition to the amount authorized to be levied for general 10purposes as provided by Section 8-3-1 of the Illinois 11Municipal Code, approved May 29, 1961, as amended. The tax 12shall be forwarded directly to the treasurer of the board 13within 30 business days after receipt by the county. 14    (b) For purposes of determining the required employer 15contribution to a pension fund, the value of the pension 16fund's assets shall be equal to the actuarial value of the 17pension fund's assets, which shall be calculated as follows:18        (1) On March 30, 2011, the actuarial value of a 19    pension fund's assets shall be equal to the market value 20    of the assets as of that date.21        (2) In determining the actuarial value of the System's 22    assets for fiscal years after March 30, 2011, any 23    actuarial gains or losses from investment return incurred 24    in a fiscal year shall be recognized in equal annual 25    amounts over the 5-year period following that fiscal year. 26    (c) If a participating municipality fails to transmit to   HB1246- 3 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1the fund contributions required of it under this Article for 2more than 90 days after the payment of those contributions is 3due, the fund may, after giving notice to the municipality, 4certify to the State Comptroller the amounts of the delinquent 5payments in accordance with any applicable rules of the 6Comptroller, and the Comptroller must, beginning in fiscal 7year 2016, deduct and remit to the fund the certified amounts 8or a portion of those amounts from the following proportions 9of payments of State funds to the municipality:10        (1) in fiscal year 2016, one-third of the total amount 11    of any payments of State funds to the municipality;12        (2) in fiscal year 2017, two-thirds of the total 13    amount of any payments of State funds to the municipality; 14    and15        (3) in fiscal year 2018 and each fiscal year 16    thereafter, the total amount of any payments of State 17    funds to the municipality. 18    The State Comptroller may not deduct from any payments of 19State funds to the municipality more than the amount of 20delinquent payments certified to the State Comptroller by the 21fund. 22    (d) The police pension fund shall consist of the following 23moneys which shall be set apart by the treasurer of the 24municipality:25        (1) All moneys derived from the taxes levied 26    hereunder;  HB1246- 4 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1        (2) Contributions by police officers under Section 2    3-125.1;3        (2.5) All moneys received from the Police Officers' 4    Pension Investment Fund as provided in Article 22B of this 5    Code; 6        (3) All moneys accumulated by the municipality under 7    any previous legislation establishing a fund for the 8    benefit of disabled or retired police officers;9        (4) Donations, gifts or other transfers authorized by 10    this Article.11    (e) The Commission on Government Forecasting and 12Accountability shall conduct a study of all funds established 13under this Article and shall report its findings to the 14General Assembly on or before January 1, 2013. To the fullest 15extent possible, the study shall include, but not be limited 16to, the following:17        (1) fund balances;18        (2) historical employer contribution rates for each 19    fund;20        (3) the actuarial formulas used as a basis for 21    employer contributions, including the actual assumed rate 22    of return for each year, for each fund;23        (4) available contribution funding sources;24        (5) the impact of any revenue limitations caused by 25    PTELL and employer home rule or non-home rule status; and26        (6) existing statutory funding compliance procedures   HB1246- 5 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1    and funding enforcement mechanisms for all municipal 2    pension funds. 3(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20.) 4    (40 ILCS 5/4-118)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-118)5    Sec. 4-118. Financing. 6    (a) The city council or the board of trustees of the 7municipality shall annually levy a tax upon all the taxable 8property of the municipality at the rate on the dollar which 9will produce an amount which, when added to the deductions 10from the salaries or wages of firefighters and revenues 11available from other sources, will equal a sum sufficient to 12meet the annual actuarial requirements of the pension fund, as 13determined by an enrolled actuary employed by the Illinois 14Department of Insurance or by an enrolled actuary retained by 15the pension fund or municipality. For the purposes of this 16Section, the annual actuarial requirements of the pension fund 17are equal to (1) the normal cost of the pension fund, or 17.5% 18of the salaries and wages to be paid to firefighters for the 19year involved, whichever is greater, plus (2) an annual amount 20sufficient to bring the total assets of the pension fund up to 2190% of the total actuarial liabilities of the pension fund by 22the end of municipal fiscal year 2050 2040, as annually 23updated and determined by an enrolled actuary employed by the 24Illinois Department of Insurance or by an enrolled actuary 25retained by the pension fund or the municipality. In making   HB1246- 6 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1these determinations, the required minimum employer 2contribution shall be calculated each year as a level 3percentage of payroll over the years remaining up to and 4including fiscal year 2050 2040 and shall be determined under 5the projected unit credit actuarial cost method. The amount to 6be applied towards the amortization of the unfunded accrued 7liability in any year shall not be less than the annual amount 8required to amortize the unfunded accrued liability, including 9interest, as a level percentage of payroll over the number of 10years remaining in the 40-year amortization period.11    (a-2) A municipality that has established a pension fund 12under this Article and that employs a full-time firefighter, 13as defined in Section 4-106, shall be deemed a primary 14employer with respect to that full-time firefighter. Any 15municipality of 5,000 or more inhabitants that employs or 16enrolls a firefighter while that firefighter continues to earn 17service credit as a participant in a primary employer's 18pension fund under this Article shall be deemed a secondary 19employer and such employees shall be deemed to be secondary 20employee firefighters. To ensure that the primary employer's 21pension fund under this Article is aware of additional 22liabilities and risks to which firefighters are exposed when 23performing work as firefighters for secondary employers, a 24secondary employer shall annually prepare a report accounting 25for all hours worked by and wages and salaries paid to the 26secondary employee firefighters it receives services from or   HB1246- 7 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1employs for each fiscal year in which such firefighters are 2employed and transmit a certified copy of that report to the 3primary employer's pension fund, the Department of Insurance, 4and the secondary employee firefighter no later than 30 days 5after the end of any fiscal year in which wages were paid to 6the secondary employee firefighters. 7    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to allow a 8secondary employee to qualify for benefits or creditable 9service for employment as a firefighter for a secondary 10employer.11    (a-5) For purposes of determining the required employer 12contribution to a pension fund, the value of the pension 13fund's assets shall be equal to the actuarial value of the 14pension fund's assets, which shall be calculated as follows:15        (1) On March 30, 2011, the actuarial value of a 16    pension fund's assets shall be equal to the market value 17    of the assets as of that date.18        (2) In determining the actuarial value of the pension 19    fund's assets for fiscal years after March 30, 2011, any 20    actuarial gains or losses from investment return incurred 21    in a fiscal year shall be recognized in equal annual 22    amounts over the 5-year period following that fiscal year. 23    (b) The tax shall be levied and collected in the same 24manner as the general taxes of the municipality, and shall be 25in addition to all other taxes now or hereafter authorized to 26be levied upon all property within the municipality, and in   HB1246- 8 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1addition to the amount authorized to be levied for general 2purposes, under Section 8-3-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code 3or under Section 14 of the Fire Protection District Act. The 4tax shall be forwarded directly to the treasurer of the board 5within 30 business days of receipt by the county (or, in the 6case of amounts added to the tax levy under subsection (f), 7used by the municipality to pay the employer contributions 8required under subsection (b-1) of Section 15-155 of this 9Code).10    (b-5) If a participating municipality fails to transmit to 11the fund contributions required of it under this Article for 12more than 90 days after the payment of those contributions is 13due, the fund may, after giving notice to the municipality, 14certify to the State Comptroller the amounts of the delinquent 15payments in accordance with any applicable rules of the 16Comptroller, and the Comptroller must, beginning in fiscal 17year 2016, deduct and remit to the fund the certified amounts 18or a portion of those amounts from the following proportions 19of payments of State funds to the municipality:20        (1) in fiscal year 2016, one-third of the total amount 21    of any payments of State funds to the municipality;22        (2) in fiscal year 2017, two-thirds of the total 23    amount of any payments of State funds to the municipality; 24    and25        (3) in fiscal year 2018 and each fiscal year 26    thereafter, the total amount of any payments of State   HB1246- 9 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1    funds to the municipality. 2    The State Comptroller may not deduct from any payments of 3State funds to the municipality more than the amount of 4delinquent payments certified to the State Comptroller by the 5fund. 6    (c) The board shall make available to the membership and 7the general public for inspection and copying at reasonable 8times the most recent Actuarial Valuation Balance Sheet and 9Tax Levy Requirement issued to the fund by the Department of 10Insurance.11    (d) The firefighters' pension fund shall consist of the 12following moneys which shall be set apart by the treasurer of 13the municipality: (1) all moneys derived from the taxes levied 14hereunder; (2) contributions by firefighters as provided under 15Section 4-118.1; (2.5) all moneys received from the 16Firefighters' Pension Investment Fund as provided in Article 1722C of this Code; (3) all rewards in money, fees, gifts, and 18emoluments that may be paid or given for or on account of 19extraordinary service by the fire department or any member 20thereof, except when allowed to be retained by competitive 21awards; and (4) any money, real estate or personal property 22received by the board.23    (e) For the purposes of this Section, "enrolled actuary" 24means an actuary: (1) who is a member of the Society of 25Actuaries or the American Academy of Actuaries; and (2) who is 26enrolled under Subtitle C of Title III of the Employee   HB1246- 10 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or who has been 2engaged in providing actuarial services to one or more public 3retirement systems for a period of at least 3 years as of July 41, 1983.5    (f) The corporate authorities of a municipality that 6employs a person who is described in subdivision (d) of 7Section 4-106 may add to the tax levy otherwise provided for in 8this Section an amount equal to the projected cost of the 9employer contributions required to be paid by the municipality 10to the State Universities Retirement System under subsection 11(b-1) of Section 15-155 of this Code.12    (g) The Commission on Government Forecasting and 13Accountability shall conduct a study of all funds established 14under this Article and shall report its findings to the 15General Assembly on or before January 1, 2013. To the fullest 16extent possible, the study shall include, but not be limited 17to, the following:18        (1) fund balances;19        (2) historical employer contribution rates for each 20    fund;21        (3) the actuarial formulas used as a basis for 22    employer contributions, including the actual assumed rate 23    of return for each year, for each fund;24        (4) available contribution funding sources;25        (5) the impact of any revenue limitations caused by 26    PTELL and employer home rule or non-home rule status; and  HB1246- 11 -LRB104 03026 RPS 13044 b1        (6) existing statutory funding compliance procedures 2    and funding enforcement mechanisms for all municipal 3    pension funds. 4(Source: P.A. 101-522, eff. 8-23-19; 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 5102-59, eff. 7-9-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 6    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 7Section 8.49 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)9    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 108 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 11the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 12Act of the 104th General Assembly. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.